Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2013
Act; applicability.

The Unauthorized Insurers Process Act shall not apply to any action, suit, or proceeding against any nonadmitted foreign or alien insurer arising out of any contract of insurance (1) effected in accordance with the Surplus Lines Insurance Act, (2) covering reinsurance, ocean marine, aircraft, or railway insurance risks, (3) against legal liability arising out of the ownership, operation, or maintenance of any property having a permanent situs outside this state, or (4) against loss of or damage to any property having a permanent situs outside this state, when such contract of insurance contains a provision designating a Nebraska resident agent duly licensed under the Surplus Lines Insurance Act to be the true and lawful attorney of such nonadmitted insurer upon whom may be served all lawful process in any action, suit, or proceeding instituted by or on behalf of an insured or beneficiary arising out of any such contract of insurance or when the insurer enters a general appearance in any action, suit, or proceeding.

Laws 1949, c. 134, § 5, p. 353;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 6, p. 1270;

Laws 1969, c. 360, § 2, p. 1283;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 56;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-137.08;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 26;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 17.

Surplus Lines Insurance Act, see section 44-5501.